Washington statutes.
RCW 36.96.050

Application for writ of prohibition or mandamus by interested party—Procedure.

The action of the county legislative authority dissolving a special purpose district pursuant to RCW 36.96.040 shall be final and conclusive unless within thirty days of the adoption of the ordinance an interested party makes application to a court of competent jurisdiction for a writ of prohibition or writ of mandamus. At the hearing upon such a writ, the applicant shall have the full burden of demonstrating that the particular special purpose district, other than a public utility district, does not meet either of the criteria of being inactive or that it is not in the public interest that the special purpose district be dissolved: PROVIDED, That where the particular special purpose district subject to the dissolution proceedings is a public utility district, the applicant shall have the full burden of demonstrating that the public utility district either does not meet both the criteria of being inactive or that it is not in the public interest to dissolve the public utility district.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 5 s 5.]